Utah statutes.
70C-2-205.   Assignee subject to defenses.
With respect to a consumer credit sale, an assignee of the rights of the
seller is subject to all defenses of the buyer against the seller arising out
of the credit sale, but the assignee's liability under this section may not
exceed the amount owing to the assignee at the time the defense is asserted
against the assignee, and the rights of the buyer may only be asserted as a
matter of defense to or setoff against a claim by the assignee.
